North Carolina statutes. Chapter 156. Drainage.
Article 8. Assessments and Bond Issue.

§ 156-94.
Total cost for three years ascertained.

After the classification of lands and the ratio of assessments of the different classes to be made thereon has been confirmed by the court, the board of drainage commissioners shall ascertain the total cost of the improvement, including damages awarded to be paid to owners of land, all costs and incidental expenses, and also including an amount sufficient to pay the necessary expenses of maintaining the improvement for a period of three years after the completion of the work of construction, not exceeding ten per centum (10%) of the estimated actual cost of constructing the drainage works or the contract price thereof if such contract has not been awarded, and after deducting therefrom any special assessments made against any railroad or highway, and, thereupon, the board of drainage commissioners, under the hand of the chairman and secretary of the board, shall certify to the clerk of the superior court the total cost, ascertained as aforesaid; and the certificate shall be forthwith recorded in the drainage record and open to inspection of any landowner in the district.

History.

1909, c. 442, s. 31; 1911, c. 67, s. 8; C.S., s. 5351; 1923, c. 217, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to application of this section, see

G.S. 156-104

.

§ 156-95.
Assessment and payment; notice of bond issue.

If the total cost of the improvement is less than an average of twenty-five cents (25¢) per acre on all the land in the district, the board of drainage commissioners shall forthwith assess the lands in the district therefor, in accordance with their classification, and said assessment shall be collected in one installment, by the same officer and in the same manner as State and county taxes are collected, and payable at the same time. In case the total cost exceeds an average of twenty-five cents (25¢) per acre on all lands in the district, the board of drainage commissioners shall give notice for three weeks by publication in some newspaper published in a county in which the district, or some part thereof, is situated, if there be any such newspaper, and also by posting a written or printed notice at the door of the courthouse and at five conspicuous places in the district, reciting that they propose to issue bonds for the payment of the total cost of the improvement, giving the amount of bonds to be issued, the rate of interest that they are to bear, and the time when payable. Any landowner in the district not wanting to pay interest on the bonds may, within 15 days after the publication of such notice, pay to the county treasurer the full amount for which his land is liable, to be ascertained from the classification sheet and the certificate of the board showing the total cost of the improvement, and have his lands released from liability to be assessed for the improvement; but such land shall continue liable for any future assessment for maintenance or for any increased assessment authorized under the law.

History.

1909, c. 442, s. 32; 1911, c. 67, s. 9; C.S., s. 5352.

§ 156-96.
Failure to pay deemed consent to bond issue.

Every person owning land in the district who shall fail to pay to the treasurer the full amount for which his land is liable, as aforesaid, within the time above specified, shall be deemed as consenting to the issuance of drainage bonds, and in consideration of the right to pay his proportion in installments, he hereby waives his rights of defense to the payment of any assessments which may be levied for the payment of bonds, because of any irregularity, illegality, or defect in the proceedings prior to this time, except in case of an appeal, as hereinbefore provided, which is not affected by this waiver. The term “person” as used in this Subchapter includes any firm, company, or corporation.

History.

1909, c. 442, s. 33; 1911, c. 67, s. 10; C.S., s. 5353; 1963, c. 767, s. 4.

§ 156-97.
Bonds issued.

At the expiration of 15 days after publication of notice of bond issue the board of drainage commissioners may issue bonds of the drainage district for an amount equal to the total cost of the improvement, less such amounts as shall have been paid in in cash to the treasurer. Bonds issued by the board of drainage commissioners shall comply with the following provisions:

The bonds shall be serial bonds;

The denomination of the bonds shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);

The interest upon said bonds shall not be more than fourteen percent (14%) per annum, from the date of issue and payable semiannually;

The first annual installment of principal shall fall due not less than three years nor more than six years after the date of the bonds;

Each annual installment of principal shall be not less than two percent (2%) nor more than ten percent (10%) of the total bonds authorized;

If the total amount of bonds to be issued does not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total amount of the assessment, the board of commissioners may, in their discretion, not issue any bonds and in lieu thereof issue assessment anticipation bonds which shall mature over a period of not less than four nor more than 10 years and shall be payable in equal annual installments. The interest rate on said assessment anticipation bonds shall not be more than fourteen percent (14%) per annum;

The board of commissioners may issue bond anticipation note or notes to be redeemed and paid upon the sale and delivery of bonds herein provided for. If such bond anticipation note or notes are issued, at the discretion of the commissioners, such may be done after the bonds have been sold and prior to the printing and delivery of said bonds and must be paid from the proceeds of said bonds when delivered.

History.

1909, c. 442, s. 34; 1911, c. 67, s. 11; 1917, c. 152, s. 12; C.S., s. 5354; 1923, c. 217, s. 5; 1955, c. 1340; 1957, c. 1410, s. 1; 1961, c. 601, s. 1; 1963, c. 767, s. 4; 1969, c. 878; 1985, c. 136, ss. 1, 2.

Cross References.

As to application of this section, see

G.S. 156-104

.

§ 156-97.1.
Issuance of assessment anticipation notes.

In lieu of the bonds provided for in

G.S. 156-97

, the board of drainage commissioners may issue assessment anticipation notes of the district for an amount not to exceed the assessment levied by the commissioners and approved by the clerk of the superior court, less such amounts as shall have been paid in in cash to the treasurer. It shall be optional with the board of drainage commissioners in issuing assessment anticipation notes to issue serial notes in any denominations bearing not more than fourteen percent (14%) interest from the date of issue, payable semiannually. The first annual installment of principal shall be due not less than one year nor more than two years after date thereof, and each annual installment of principal shall not be less than two percent (2%) nor more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total amount of notes authorized and issued.

Such assessment anticipation notes, when issued, shall have the same force and effect of bonds issued under the provisions of this Article and shall be collectible in the same manner.

The commissioners may issue either serial notes or an amortized note.

History.

1957, c. 912, s. 2; 1961, c. 601, s. 3; 1963, c. 767, ss. 4, 7; 1985, c. 136, s. 3.

§ 156-98.
Form of bonds and notes; excess assessment.

All bonds and notes authorized and issued shall be signed by the chairman and secretary of the board of drainage commissioners and the corporate seal of the district affixed thereto, and the interest coupons shall be authenticated by the facsimile signature of the secretary, and both the principal and interest coupons shall be payable at some bank or trust company to be designated by the board of drainage commissioners and incorporated in the body of the bond. The form of the bond shall be authorized by the board of drainage commissioners or by the board and the purchaser of the bonds jointly, at the option of the board.

All bonds of reclamation districts shall have that fact noted upon the face of the bond, either by stamping or printing the same thereon. All bonds of improvement districts shall also have that fact noted upon their face.

For the purpose of meeting any possible deficit in the collection of annual drainage assessments or any deficit arising out of unforeseen contingencies there shall be levied, assessed and collected during each year when either the interest or principal or both interest and principal on the outstanding bonds shall be due, an assessment as will yield ten percent (10%) more than the total of interest and principal due in such years; that is to say, for every one hundred dollars ($100.00) of principal and interest, or either, due in any one year, there shall be levied, assessed and collected a sufficient drainage assessment to yield one hundred and ten dollars ($110.00) for such year. When this excess of drainage tax so levied, assessed and collected shall accumulate so that the aggregate surplus in the hands of the treasurer of the district shall amount to more than fifteen percent (15%) of the total principal of the bonds of the district outstanding and unpaid, then such surplus above fifteen percent (15%) thereof may be available for expenditure by the board of drainage commissioners in the maintenance and upkeep of the drainage work in such district in the manner provided by law: After all the drainage assessments have been collected except the last assessment, if the surplus which has accumulated amounts to more than five percent (5%) of the total issue of bonds of the district, then and in such event the board of drainage commissioners may in their discretion apply such excess above five percent (5%) toward the reduction of the total amount embraced in the last assessment, reducing the same pro rata as to each tract of land embraced in the district, and having regard to the classification, to the end that such reduction shall be fairly and justly made. As to such surplus as shall accumulate in the hands of the treasurer of the district over and above all obligations of the district which may be due, the treasurer is hereby directed to deposit same in some solvent bank or banks at the highest rate of interest obtainable therefor, and the said treasurer shall be authorized, if he deems it necessary, to demand satisfactory security for such deposits; but the said treasurer shall reserve the right to demand a repayment at any time upon giving not exceeding 30 days’ notice thereof. Whereas the proceeds of the first drainage assessment may not be collected and in the hands of the treasurer of the district prior to the maturity of the first and second semiannual installments of interest upon the issue of bonds, the treasurer of the district is hereby directed to pay the interest coupons first maturing and also the interest coupons next maturing, if necessary, out of funds in his hands for the purpose of maintaining the improvement for the period of three years after the completion of the work or construction. As a surplus fund with the treasurer arising out of the annual additional assessment of ten per centum (10%) shall accumulate in any one year in excess of fifteen per centum (15%) of the total principal of the bonds of the district outstanding and unpaid, as herein provided, the treasurer shall transfer in each of such years such surplus fund to the fund for maintaining the improvement after completion, as a reimbursement of the fund formerly withdrawn therefrom for the payment of the first and second installments of interest coupons until such reimbursement shall be fully made. The treasurer shall thereafter keep separate accounts of the proceeds of such additional ten percent (10%) assessment remaining each year after the payment of all maturing obligations, and also a separate account of the funds provided for maintaining the improvement for the period of three years after completion of improvement and all payments therefrom and reimbursements thereto.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 13; C.S., s. 5355; 1923, c. 217, s. 6; 1927, c. 98, s. 5; 1961, c. 601, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to application of this section, see

G.S. 156-104

.

§ 156-99.
Application of funds; holder’s remedy.

The commissioners of the district may sell the bonds or notes of the district for not less than par and devote the proceeds to the payment of the work as it progresses and to the payment of the other expenses of the district provided for in this Subchapter. The proceeds from the sale of the said bonds or notes shall be for the exclusive use of the levee or drainage district specified therein. A copy of said bonds or notes shall be recorded in the drainage record. If serial bonds or notes are issued it shall only be necessary to record the first numbered bond or note, with a statement showing the serial numbers, the amount and the due dates of principal and interest.

There shall be set out specifically in the drainage record of said proceeding, a description of the lands embraced in the district for which the tax or assessment has not been paid in full, and which is subject to the lien of the said obligations. A reference to the tract number on the map of the district as recorded in the drainage proceedings or in the office of the register of deeds is sufficient description.

If any installment of principal or interest represented by the bonds and notes shall not be paid at the time and in the manner when the same shall become due and payable, and such default shall continue for a period of six months, the holders of such bonds or notes upon which default has been made may have a right of action against the drainage district or the board of drainage commissioners of the district, its officers, including the tax collector and treasurer, directing the levying of a tax or special assessment as herein provided, and the collection of same, in such sum as may be necessary to meet any unpaid installments of principal and interest and costs of action; and such other remedies are hereby vested in the holders of such bonds or notes in default, as may be authorized by law and the right of action is hereby vested in the holders if such bonds or notes upon which default has been made, authorizing them to institute suit against any officer on his official bond for failure to perform any duty imposed by the provisions of this Subchapter.

The official bond for the tax collector and treasurer shall be liable for the faithful performance of the duties herein assigned them. Such bond may be increased by the board of county commissioners.

History.

1909, c. 442, s. 34; 1911, c. 67, s. 11; c. 205; C.S., s. 5356; 1923, c. 217, s. 7; 1963, c. 767, s. 8.

§ 156-100.
Sale of bonds.

In making the sale of drainage bonds the board of drainage commissioners shall prepare a notice of such sale containing the usual and appropriate information regarding the terms and provisions of the bonds, and shall publish the same for at least a period of two weeks in at least one paper of general circulation published within the State and in at least one other newspaper of large circulation among the buyers of bonds, in which they shall invite sealed bids from prospective purchasers to be opened on a certain day, and may require a cash deposit to accompany all bids, and shall reserve the right to reject any and all bids. In such notice the commissioners may hold in reserve information as to the date when the first installment of principal shall fall due, the annual installments of principal to be paid, the number of years within which the serial bonds are to be paid, the form of the bonds, and the name of the bank or trust company at which the interest coupons and the installments of principal are to be made payable, and shall state that the information and data so withheld may subsequently be agreed upon between the drainage commissioners and the purchaser of the bonds; or the board of drainage commissioners in their advertisement asking bids may make optional propositions in the respects above recited, inviting bids as to each kind of bond so proposed. The board of drainage commissioners shall accept the highest bona fide bid for such bonds and issue and sell the same accordingly, provided the highest bid shall equal or exceed the par value of the bonds with any accrued interest thereon. If no satisfactory bid shall be received, the board of drainage commissioners may readvertise the bonds for sale in the manner above provided, or they may accept any private bid for the bonds at not less than their par value, with any accrued interest thereon. The board of drainage commissioners shall in good faith make diligent effort to sell the bonds at a price not less than their par value, with accrued interest. Bonds of any drainage district heretofore sold or contracted to be sold by the Local Government Commission in the manner provided by the Local Government Act, either alone or in conjunction with the board of drainage commissioners, shall be deemed to have been lawfully sold or contracted to be sold.

History.

1909, c. 442, s. 34; 1911, c. 67, s. 11; 1917, c. 152, s. 15; C.S., s. 5357; 1941, c. 142.

Local Modification.

Brunswick, Columbus: 1929, c. 299.

Cross References.

As to application of this section, see

G.S. 156-104

.

§ 156-100.1.
Sale of assessment anticipation notes.

Should assessment anticipation notes be issued by a drainage district under the provisions of

G.S. 156-97.1

, the board of drainage commissioners may accept any private bid for said assessment anticipation notes at not less than their par value, with accrued interest thereon without the necessity of advertising the sale hereof as is provided for in the sale of bonds under the provisions of

G.S. 156-100

.

History.

1957, c. 912, s. 3.

§ 156-100.2.
Payment of assessments which become liens after original bond issue.

Payment of assessments not included in the original bond or note issue shall be financed in the following manner:

In the event of appeal from the order of the clerk of superior court approving the final report of the board of viewers, the assessment approved by the appellate court shall be due and payable 30 days from the entry of the final order in said appeal.

In the event land should be included within the district for any other reason, the assessment thereon shall be due and payable 30 days after the date of the agreement or court order by which said land is included.

In the event the assessments referred to in the preceding subdivisions (1) and (2) are not paid at the expiration of the said 30-day period, then the commissioners may provide for installment payments of said assessment upon such terms as may be approved by the clerk of the superior court who has jurisdiction of the said drainage proceeding.The commissioners of the district may issue bonds or notes for an amount equal to the total of the installment payments, upon terms as approved by the clerk of the superior court. The lien of the assessment, the rights of the bond or note holder, and all other liabilities and rights shall be the same as prescribed in this Subchapter III for other bonds and notes of the district.

History.

1963, c. 767, s. 9.

§ 156-100.3.
Sinking fund.

The commissioners of the drainage district may establish a sinking fund to be used to pay bonds and notes issued by the district. The terms and conditions by which the said sinking fund is established shall be approved by the clerk of the superior court who has jurisdiction of said district.

History.

1963, c. 767, s. 10.

§ 156-101.
Refunding bonds issued.

In any case where the board of drainage commissioners of any drainage district have issued or may issue bonds for the purpose of constructing or completing the drainage works in such district, the payment of which at maturity would in the judgment of the board of drainage commissioners be an unreasonable burden on the owners of the lands in such district assessed for the payment of such bonds and interest, or if it shall appear for other good and substantial reasons that the welfare of the district and the owners of lands therein would be promoted thereby, the board of drainage commissioners shall have the power to refund such bonds, or any part thereof, and issue new bonds equal to the amount of bonds outstanding and unpaid, or any part thereof. The new or refunding bonds shall bear a rate of interest not exceeding six percent (6%) payable semiannually, and shall be divided into such annual installments not exceeding ten percent (10%) and not less than five percent (5%) of the outstanding bonds so refunded. The new assessments shall be levied and collected with which to pay the principal and interest on the bonds in the manner provided by law. The first installment of principal on the bonds so refunded may be made payable at a certain date in the future not exceeding six years from the date of the refunding bonds, and in the meantime annual assessments shall be levied and collected for the payment of the interest.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 14; C.S., s. 5358.

§ 156-102.
Drainage bonds received as deposits.

The State Treasurer is authorized to receive drainage bonds issued by drainage districts in North Carolina as deposits from banks, insurance companies, and other corporations required by law to make deposits with the State Treasurer: Provided, that the Attorney General shall have approved the form of such bonds.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 7; C.S., s. 5359.

Local Modification.

Edgecombe, Pitt: 1937, c. 334.

§ 156-103.
Assessment rolls prepared.

The board of drainage commissioners shall immediately prepare the assessment rolls or drainage tax lists, giving thereon the names of the owners of land in the district and a brief description of the several tracts of land assessed and the amount of assessment against each tract of land. The first of these assessment rolls shall be due and payable on the first Monday in September following the date of such bonds, and shall provide funds sufficient for the payment of interest on such bonds for one year. The second assessment roll shall make like provision for the payment of the interest for one year. Annual assessment rolls shall thereafter provide funds sufficient to meet the interest for one year on the issue of bonds outstanding. During the year previous to maturity of any annual installment due upon the principal of said bonds there shall be an assessment roll sufficient to provide funds for the payment of both the interest for one year and for the payment of the annual installment due upon the principal of the bonds. Such annual assessments shall be made from year to year to provide funds to meet the interest for one year and the annual installment of the principal due upon the bonds outstanding, until the whole principal due upon the outstanding bonds and the interest thereon shall be fully paid. In making up such assessment rolls there shall be included ten percent (10%) additional as provided in

G.S. 156-98

. Each of the assessment rolls shall specify the time when collectible and be numbered in their order, and the amounts assessed against the several tracts of land shall be in accordance with the benefits received, as shown by the classification and ratio of assessments made by the viewers. These assessment rolls shall be signed by the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners and by the secretary of the board. There shall be four copies of each of the assessment rolls, one of which shall be filed with the drainage record, one shall be filed with the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners, who shall carefully preserve the same, one shall be preserved by the clerk of the court, without change or mutilation, for the purposes of reference or comparison, and one shall be delivered to the sheriff, or other county tax collector, after the clerk of the superior court has appended thereto an order directing the collection of such assessments, and the assessments, shall thereupon have the force and effect of a judgment as in the case of State and county taxes. If the drainage commission which has assessed the lands of a drainage district prior to March 11, 1919, shall file the aforesaid four copies of assessment rolls within six months from April 1, 1919, the filing of such assessment rolls shall have the same legal effect as if filed strictly in accordance with this section immediately after the preparation of such assessment rolls. The State having authorized the creation of drainage districts and having delegated thereto the power to levy a valid tax in furtherance of the public purposes thereof, it is hereby declared that drainage districts heretofore or hereafter organized under existing law or any subsequent amendments thereto are created for a public use and are political subdivisions of the State.

History.

1911, c. 67, s. 12; 1917, c. 152, s. 9; 1919, c. 282, s. 1; C.S., s. 5360; 1921, c. 7; 1923, c. 217, s. 8.

Cross References.

As to application of this section, see

G.S. 156-104

.

§ 156-104.
Application of amendatory provisions of certain sections; amendment or reformation of proceedings.

All the provisions of Chapter 217 of the Public Laws of 1923 amendatory of

G.S. 156-71

, 156-75, 156-83, 156-94, 156-97, 156-98, 156-99 and 156-103 shall apply to all drainage districts which shall hereafter be organized, and also to all districts where proceedings for the organization thereof have been instituted and are now pending and where the bonds have not been actually issued, sold, and delivered to the purchaser thereof. If it shall be necessary to amend or reform any of the pleadings or orders made by the court or any action taken by the board of drainage commissioners in any drainage proceedings instituted and pending before March 6, 1923, full authority is granted to make any such amendments, to the end that the said drainage proceedings shall conform with the provisions hereof.

History.

1923, c. 217, s. 9; C.S., s. 5360(a).

Local Modification.

Hyde: 1923, c. 217, s. 10; C.S., s. 5360(a).

§ 156-105.
Assessment lien; collection; sale of land.

The assessments shall constitute a first and paramount lien, second only to State and county taxes, upon the lands assessed for the payment of the bonds and interest thereon as they become due, and shall be collected in the same manner and by the same officers as the State and county taxes are collected. The assessments shall be due and payable on the first Monday in September each year, and if the same shall not be paid in full by the thirty-first day of December following, it shall be the duty of the sheriff or tax collector to sell the lands so delinquent. The sale of lands for failure to pay such assessments shall be made at the courthouse door of the county in which the lands are situated, between the hours of 10 o’clock in the forenoon and four o’clock in the afternoon of any date except Sunday or another legal holiday when the courthouse is closed for transactions, which may be designated by the board of drainage commissioners. After any such sale date has been designated by the board of drainage commissioners, if for any necessary cause the sale cannot be made on that date, the sale may be continued from day to day for not exceeding four days, or the lands may be readvertised and sold on any day which the board of drainage commissioners may or shall designate during the same hours and without any order being obtained therefor during the same calendar year. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any order from any court for any sale or resale held hereunder. The existing general tax law in force when sales are made for delinquent assessments shall have application in redeeming lands so sold; and in all other respects, except as herein or otherwise modified or amended, the existing law as to the collection of State and county taxes shall apply to the collection of such drainage assessments. No bid at any sale shall be received unless sufficient in amount to discharge all the drainage assessments and other charges due by the delinquent lands or owner thereof, together with all costs and expenses of sale. If no sufficient bid be received, the board of drainage commissioners of the district shall be deemed the purchaser in its corporate capacity at a sum sufficient to pay all assessments which are due and costs as above stated, and shall be entitled to receive a certificate of purchase and deed in the manner provided by law for purchasers at tax sales. The board of drainage commissioners shall only be required to pay to the sheriff the costs and expenses of sale before receiving a certificate of purchase. The board of drainage commissioners of the district in their corporate capacity shall be in like position and have the same rights and be subject to the same duties as the purchaser of lands at any tax sale under the general law. If the board of drainage commissioners shall have been the purchaser of lands so sold, the amount paid in redemption by the owner, or any person having an estate therein or lien thereon, shall include the sum bid therefor plus the penalty. The board of drainage commissioners shall pay to the sheriff or tax collector the amount representing their bid at the sale of said lands before they shall be entitled to receive a deed therefor, which the sheriff shall pay to the treasurer of the drainage district in the same manner as other funds received by him. The board of drainage commissioners, after acquiring a deed for said lands, may hold the same as an asset of the district, and shall be liable for the payment of all drainage assessments and State and county taxes accruing after the sale at which the district was a bidder, and in all respects be deemed the owner of said lands and subject to the same privileges and liabilities as any other landowner, including the right to convey the said lands for a consideration and pay the proceeds of said sale to the treasurer of the district, which may be distributed by the drainage commissioners for the benefit of the district in the same manner as other district funds.

If any sheriff or tax collector failed for any reason to collect drainage assessments upon lands in any drainage districts due in 1917, or any subsequent years, and further failed to make valid sales of the lands so delinquent in the payment of such assessments, then and in such event the existing sheriff or tax collector is hereby authorized and directed to proceed to collect such unpaid drainage assessments, with interest thereon from the dates when such assessments respectively became due, and in default of payment being made he is further authorized to make sales of such lands as may be in default at any time hereafter, at the times and in the manner authorized by law as amended herein; and the purchaser at said sales shall acquire title to such lands in the manner provided by law. If the sheriff or tax collector in office at the time such assessments were in default has since died or gone out of office, the powers herein given shall be exercised by the existing sheriff or tax collector.

The 1931 amendment to this section shall have the same force and effect from and after April 13, 1931, as if it had been ratified and enacted prior to the first day of January, 1929, and no sale of drainage lands held under the provisions of section 5361 shall be deemed or declared void by reason of the fact that they may not have been held on the day specified in section 5361 of the Consolidated Statutes prior to this amendment.

History.

1911, c. 67, s. 12; 1917, c. 152, s. 9; C.S., s. 5361; Pub. Loc. 1923, c. 88, ss. 3, 4, 5; 1931, c. 273; 2003-337, s. 12.

Local Modification.

Franklin, Hyde, Nash, Wilson: Pub. Loc. 1923, c. 88.

§ 156-106.
Assessment not collectible out of other property of delinquent.

Only the land assessed in the drainage proceeding shall be liable for the drainage tax or assessment, and no other property of the landowner shall or may be sold for said drainage tax or assessment: Provided, that this section shall not apply to any drainage bond sold and delivered prior to March 7, 1927, or to any litigation pending at that time.

History.

1919, c. 282, s. 2; C.S., s. 5362; 1927, c. 139.

Local Modification.

Cumberland, Robeson: 1927, c. 139, s. 11/2.

§ 156-107.
Sheriff in good faith selling property for assessment not liable for irregularity.

The sheriff who executes upon property for the collection of drainage assessments under the provisions of this Article shall not be liable either civilly or criminally if he shall sell such property in good faith, even though such sale is irregular or for any cause illegal.

History.

1919, c. 282, s. 4; C.S., s. 5363.

§ 156-108.
Receipt books prepared.

The clerk of the superior court in each county where one or more drainage districts have been established shall be required to have prepared annually during the month of August a form of receipt, with appropriate stubs attached and properly bound, for the drainage assessments due on each tract of land as recited in the assessment rolls. This bound book of tax receipts or bills shall be indorsed “Drainage assessments of the (here give the name of the district) for the county of
_______________ , delivered to the sheriff or tax collector as of the first Monday in September,
_______________ , for collection as required by law,” and the same indorsement shall be printed at the top of each tax bill or blank receipt. Each tax bill or blank receipt shall contain a blank space for the name of the owner of the property, the amount of the annual drainage tax, the amount of maintenance tax, if any, and a receipt at the bottom of the same, followed by a blank line for the signature of the tax collector. This bound book of tax bills or receipts, with the blanks duly filled in, shall be delivered to the sheriff or tax collector on the first Monday of September of each year. The necessary cost of printing and binding such book of tax bills or receipts and the filling in of the same shall be a proper charge against such drainage district and shall be paid by the board of drainage commissioners.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 9; 1919, c. 208, s. 2; C.S., s. 5364; 1999-456, s. 59.

§ 156-109.
Receipt books where lands in two or more counties.

Where any drainage district which has been established contains lands located in a county or counties other than the county in which the district was established, the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the district was established shall have prepared annually during the month of August a form of tax bills or receipts, with appropriate stubs attached, covering all the lands in the drainage district located in such other county or counties, and in the form herein provided for the county in which the district has been established, and have the same substantially bound in book form. He shall also fill in the blanks of such tax receipts ready for the signature of the collector. On a page in such bound book after the tax bills or receipts there shall be appended an order directed to the sheriff or tax collector in the county in which such lands are located, which shall be in substantially the following form: State of North Carolina — County of
_______________ . The Sheriff or Tax Collector of
_______________
County: This is to certify that the foregoing tax bills or blank receipts embrace the drainage assessments made on certain lands in the county of
_______________ , which are located in and are a part of (here insert the name of the drainage district), which district was established in the county of
_______________ .These assessments are due on the first Monday of September,
_______________ , and must be paid and collected within the time required by law. You will make monthly settlements of your collections with the treasurer of
_______________
County, being the county in which the district was established, and in all other respects you will discharge your duties as sheriff or tax collector as required by law. In witness whereof, I have hereunto set my hand and official seal, this
_______________
day of
_______________ ,
_______________ .

Clerk Superior Court County.

Click to view

Thereupon such drainage assessments in such county shall have the force and effect of a judgment upon the lands so assessed, as in the case of State and county taxes, and shall in all other respects be as valid assessments as those levied upon lands in the county in which the district was established. The auditor for drainage districts herein authorized shall also examine the records and accounts of the sheriff of such county. In the establishment and administration of the drainage districts the clerk of the superior court, the treasurer, and the chairman of the board of drainage commissioners shall have jurisdiction over the lands and the collection of drainage assessments in the county or counties other than the county in which the district was established to the same extent as in the county where such district was established: Provided, that in those counties which do not have a county treasurer, then the auditor provided for in this Subchapter shall perform the duties required by this section for the county treasurer.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 11; C.S., s. 5365; 1963, c. 767, s. 4; 1999-456, s. 59.

§ 156-110.
Authority to collect arrears.

If any sheriff or tax collector was authorized to collect drainage assessments in any year prior to 1917, and failed to collect any part of such drainage assessments, and is now out of office, or is still holding the office of sheriff or tax collector, then and in such event such sheriff or tax collector, regardless of the expiration of his term of office, is hereby authorized and directed to proceed to the collection of such unpaid drainage assessments, and in default of payment being made, he is further authorized to make sales of such lands as may be in default at the times and in the manner authorized by law during the year 1917, 1918 or 1919.

History.

1917, c. 152, s. 9; C.S., s. 5366.

§ 156-111.
Sheriff to make monthly settlements; penalty.

The sheriff or tax collector shall be required to make settlements with the treasurer on the first day of each month of all collections of drainage assessments for the preceding month, and to pay over to the treasurer the money so collected, for which the treasurer shall execute an appropriate receipt, to the end that the treasurer may have funds in hand to meet the payments of the interest and principal due upon the outstanding bonds as they mature. If any sheriff or tax collector shall fail to comply with the law for the collection of drainage assessments, or in making payments thereof to the treasurer as provided by law, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and he shall likewise be liable in a civil action for all damages which may accrue either to the board of drainage commissioners or to the holder of the bonds, to either or both of whom a right of action is given.

History.

1911, c. 67, s. 12; 1917, c. 152, s. 9; C.S., s. 5367; 1963, c. 767, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 1076; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).